Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.100

Federal peace officers—No additional powers.

Federal peace officers shall have no additional powers by virtue of this chapter but shall be limited to those powers already vested by law or hereafter created by separate enactment.

[ 1985 c 89 s 10.]